Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska62-304
Violations; penalty.

Any person who shall violate any of the provisions of section 62-303 shall be deemed guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1915, c. 220, § 2, p. 490;

C.S.1922, § 4808;

C.S.1929, § 62-1709;

R.S.1943, § 62-304;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 107.